test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-xjaryxj_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.
# (20230502: Csilla)


  Noun - ща̄рыщ: # Noun 122 'ocean' - full paradigm
     ща̄рыщ+N+Sg+Nom: ща̄рыщ
     ща̄рыщ+N+Sg+Loc: ща̄рыщт
     ща̄рыщ+N+Sg+Lat: ща̄рыщн
     ща̄рыщ+N+Sg+Abl: ща̄рыщныл
     ща̄рыщ+N+Sg+Ins: ща̄рщил
     ща̄рыщ+N+Sg+Tra: ща̄рщиг

     ща̄рыщ+N+Du+Nom: ща̄рщиг
     ща̄рыщ+N+Du+Loc: ща̄рщигт
     ща̄рыщ+N+Du+Lat: ща̄рщигн
     ща̄рыщ+N+Du+Abl: ща̄рщигныл
     ща̄рыщ+N+Du+Ins: ща̄рщигтыл

     ща̄рыщ+N+Pl+Nom: ща̄рщит
     ща̄рыщ+N+Pl+Loc: [ща̄рщитт, ща̄рщитыт]
     ща̄рыщ+N+Pl+Lat: [ща̄рщитн, ща̄рщитын]
     ща̄рыщ+N+Pl+Abl: ща̄рщитныл
     ща̄рыщ+N+Pl+Ins: ща̄рщитыл

     ща̄рыщ+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg1: ща̄рщум
     ща̄рыщ+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg1: ща̄рщумт
     ща̄рыщ+N+Sg+Lat+PxSg1: ща̄рщумн
     ща̄рыщ+N+Sg+Abl+PxSg1: ща̄рщумныл
     ща̄рыщ+N+Sg+Ins+PxSg1: ща̄рщумтыл
     ща̄рыщ+N+Sg+Tra+PxSg1: ща̄рщумыг

     ща̄рыщ+N+Du+Nom+PxSg1: ща̄рщагум
     ща̄рыщ+N+Du+Loc+PxSg1: ща̄рщагумт
     ща̄рыщ+N+Du+Lat+PxSg1: ща̄рщагумн
     ща̄рыщ+N+Du+Abl+PxSg1: ща̄рщагумныл
     ща̄рыщ+N+Du+Ins+PxSg1: ща̄рщагумтыл

     ща̄рыщ+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg1: ща̄рщанум
     ща̄рыщ+N+Pl+Loc+PxSg1: ща̄рщанумт
     ща̄рыщ+N+Pl+Lat+PxSg1: ща̄рщанумн
     ща̄рыщ+N+Pl+Abl+PxSg1: ща̄рщанумныл
     ща̄рыщ+N+Pl+Ins+PxSg1: ща̄рщанумтыл

     ща̄рыщ+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg2: ща̄рщин
     ща̄рыщ+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg2: ща̄рщинт
     ща̄рыщ+N+Sg+Lat+PxSg2: ща̄рщинн
     ща̄рыщ+N+Sg+Abl+PxSg2: ща̄рщинныл
     ща̄рыщ+N+Sg+Ins+PxSg2: ща̄рщинтыл
     ща̄рыщ+N+Sg+Tra+PxSg2: ща̄рщиныг

     ща̄рыщ+N+Du+Nom+PxSg2: [ща̄рщагын, ща̄рщагн]
     ща̄рыщ+N+Du+Loc+PxSg2: ща̄рщагынт
     ща̄рыщ+N+Du+Lat+PxSg2: ща̄рщагынн
     ща̄рыщ+N+Du+Abl+PxSg2: ща̄рщагынныл
     ща̄рыщ+N+Du+Ins+PxSg2: ща̄рщагынтыл

     ща̄рыщ+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg2: [ща̄рщанын, ща̄рщан]
     ща̄рыщ+N+Pl+Loc+PxSg2: [ща̄рщанынт, ща̄рщант]
     ща̄рыщ+N+Pl+Lat+PxSg2: [ща̄рщанынн, ща̄рщанн]
     ща̄рыщ+N+Pl+Abl+PxSg2: [ща̄рщанынныл, ща̄рщанныл]
     ща̄рыщ+N+Pl+Ins+PxSg2: [ща̄рщанынтыл, ща̄рщантыл]

     ща̄рыщ+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg3: ща̄рще
     ща̄рыщ+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg3: [ща̄рще̄т, ща̄рщет]
     ща̄рыщ+N+Sg+Lat+PxSg3: [ща̄рще̄н, ща̄рщен]
     ща̄рыщ+N+Sg+Abl+PxSg3: [ща̄рще̄ныл, ща̄рщеныл]
     ща̄рыщ+N+Sg+Ins+PxSg3: [ща̄рще̄нтыл, ща̄рщентыл]
     ща̄рыщ+N+Sg+Tra+PxSg3: [ща̄рще̄г, ща̄рщег]

     ща̄рыщ+N+Du+Nom+PxSg3: ща̄рщаге
     ща̄рыщ+N+Du+Loc+PxSg3: [ща̄рщаге̄т, ща̄рщагет]
     ща̄рыщ+N+Du+Lat+PxSg3: [ща̄рщаге̄н, ща̄рщаген]
     ща̄рыщ+N+Du+Abl+PxSg3: [ща̄рщаге̄ныл, ща̄рщагеныл]
     ща̄рыщ+N+Du+Ins+PxSg3: [ща̄рщаге̄тыл, ща̄рщагетыл]

     ща̄рыщ+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg3: ща̄рщанэ
     ща̄рыщ+N+Pl+Loc+PxSg3: [ща̄рщанэ̄т, ща̄рщанэт]
     ща̄рыщ+N+Pl+Lat+PxSg3: [ща̄рщанэ̄н, ща̄рщанэн]
     ща̄рыщ+N+Pl+Abl+PxSg3: [ща̄рщанэ̄ныл, ща̄рщанэныл]
     ща̄рыщ+N+Pl+Ins+PxSg3: [ща̄рщанэ̄тыл, ща̄рщанэтыл]

     ща̄рыщ+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu1: [ща̄рщаме̄н, ща̄рщамен]
     ща̄рыщ+N+Sg+Loc+PxDu1: [ща̄рщаме̄нт, ща̄рщамент]
     ща̄рыщ+N+Sg+Lat+PxDu1: [ща̄рщаме̄нн, ща̄рщаменн]
     ща̄рыщ+N+Sg+Abl+PxDu1: [ща̄рщаме̄нныл, ща̄рщаменныл]
     ща̄рыщ+N+Sg+Ins+PxDu1: [ща̄рщаме̄нтыл, ща̄рщаментыл]

     ща̄рыщ+N+Du+Nom+PxDu1: [ща̄рщагаме̄н, ща̄рщагамен, ща̄рщагмен]
     ща̄рыщ+N+Du+Loc+PxDu1: [ща̄рщагаме̄нт, ща̄рщагамент, ща̄рщагмент]
     ща̄рыщ+N+Du+Lat+PxDu1: [ща̄рщагаме̄нн, ща̄рщагаменн, ща̄рщагменн]
     ща̄рыщ+N+Du+Abl+PxDu1: [ща̄рщагаме̄нныл, ща̄рщагаменныл, ща̄рщагменныл]
     ща̄рыщ+N+Du+Ins+PxDu1: [ща̄рщагаме̄нтыл, ща̄рщагаментыл, ща̄рщагментыл]

     ща̄рыщ+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu1: [ща̄рщанаме̄н, ща̄рщанамен]
     ща̄рыщ+N+Pl+Loc+PxDu1: [ща̄рщанаме̄нт, ща̄рщанамент]
     ща̄рыщ+N+Pl+Lat+PxDu1: [ща̄рщанаме̄нн, ща̄рщанаменн]
     ща̄рыщ+N+Pl+Abl+PxDu1: [ща̄рщанаме̄нныл, ща̄рщанаменныл]
     ща̄рыщ+N+Pl+Ins+PxDu1: [ща̄рщанаме̄нтыл, ща̄рщанаментыл]

     ща̄рыщ+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu2: [ща̄рщин, ща̄рщӣн]
     ща̄рыщ+N+Sg+Loc+PxDu2: [ща̄рщинт, ща̄рщӣнт]
     ща̄рыщ+N+Sg+Lat+PxDu2: [ща̄рщинн, ща̄рщӣнн]
     ща̄рыщ+N+Sg+Abl+PxDu2: [ща̄рщинныл, ща̄рщӣнныл]
     ща̄рыщ+N+Sg+Ins+PxDu2: [ща̄рщинтыл, ща̄рщӣнтыл]

     ща̄рыщ+N+Du+Nom+PxDu2: [ща̄рщагын, ща̄рщагы̄н]
     ща̄рыщ+N+Du+Loc+PxDu2: [ща̄рщагынт, ща̄рщагы̄нт]
     ща̄рыщ+N+Du+Lat+PxDu2: [ща̄рщагынн, ща̄рщагы̄нн]
     ща̄рыщ+N+Du+Abl+PxDu2: [ща̄рщагынныл, ща̄рщагы̄нныл]
     ща̄рыщ+N+Du+Ins+PxDu2: [ща̄рщагынтыл, ща̄рщагы̄нтыл]

     ща̄рыщ+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu2: [ща̄рщанын, ща̄рщаны̄н, ща̄рщан]
     ща̄рыщ+N+Pl+Loc+PxDu2: [ща̄рщанынт, ща̄рщаны̄нт, ща̄рщант]
     ща̄рыщ+N+Pl+Lat+PxDu2: [ща̄рщанынн, ща̄рщаны̄нн, ща̄рщанн]
     ща̄рыщ+N+Pl+Abl+PxDu2: [ща̄рщанынныл, ща̄рщаны̄нныл, ща̄рщанныл]
     ща̄рыщ+N+Pl+Ins+PxDu2: [ща̄рщанынтыл, ща̄рщаны̄нтыл, ща̄рщантыл]

     ща̄рыщ+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu3: [ща̄рще̄н, ща̄рщен]
     ща̄рыщ+N+Sg+Loc+PxDu3: [ща̄рще̄нт, ща̄рщент]
     ща̄рыщ+N+Sg+Lat+PxDu3: [ща̄рще̄нн, ща̄рщенн]
     ща̄рыщ+N+Sg+Abl+PxDu3: [ща̄рще̄нныл, ща̄рщенныл]
     ща̄рыщ+N+Sg+Ins+PxDu3: [ща̄рще̄нтыл, ща̄рщентыл]

     ща̄рыщ+N+Du+Nom+PxDu3: [ща̄рщаге̄н, ща̄рщаген]
     ща̄рыщ+N+Du+Loc+PxDu3: [ща̄рщаге̄нт, ща̄рщагент]
     ща̄рыщ+N+Du+Lat+PxDu3: [ща̄рщаге̄нн, ща̄рщагенн]
     ща̄рыщ+N+Du+Abl+PxDu3: [ща̄рщаге̄нныл, ща̄рщагенныл]
     ща̄рыщ+N+Du+Ins+PxDu3: [ща̄рщаге̄нтыл, ща̄рщагентыл]

     ща̄рыщ+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu3: [ща̄рщанэ̄н, ща̄рщанэн]
     ща̄рыщ+N+Pl+Loc+PxDu3: [ща̄рщанэ̄нт, ща̄рщанэнт]
     ща̄рыщ+N+Pl+Lat+PxDu3: [ща̄рщанэ̄нн, ща̄рщанэнн]
     ща̄рыщ+N+Pl+Abl+PxDu3: [ща̄рщанэ̄нныл, ща̄рщанэнныл]
     ща̄рыщ+N+Pl+Ins+PxDu3: [ща̄рщанэ̄нтыл, ща̄рщанэнтыл]

     ща̄рыщ+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl1: ща̄рщув
     ща̄рыщ+N+Sg+Loc+PxPl1: ща̄рщувт
     ща̄рыщ+N+Sg+Lat+PxPl1: ща̄рщувн
     ща̄рыщ+N+Sg+Abl+PxPl1: ща̄рщувныл
     ща̄рыщ+N+Sg+Ins+PxPl1: ща̄рщувтыл

     ща̄рыщ+N+Du+Nom+PxPl1: ща̄рщагув
     ща̄рыщ+N+Du+Loc+PxPl1: ща̄рщагувт
     ща̄рыщ+N+Du+Lat+PxPl1: ща̄рщагувн
     ща̄рыщ+N+Du+Abl+PxPl1: ща̄рщагувныл
     ща̄рыщ+N+Du+Ins+PxPl1: ща̄рщагувтыл

     ща̄рыщ+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl1: ща̄рщанув
     ща̄рыщ+N+Pl+Loc+PxPl1: ща̄рщанувт
     ща̄рыщ+N+Pl+Lat+PxPl1: ща̄рщанувн
     ща̄рыщ+N+Pl+Abl+PxPl1: ща̄рщанувныл
     ща̄рыщ+N+Pl+Ins+PxPl1: ща̄рщанувтыл

     ща̄рыщ+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl2: [ща̄рщин, ща̄рщӣн]
     ща̄рыщ+N+Sg+Loc+PxPl2: [ща̄рщинт, ща̄рщинт]
     ща̄рыщ+N+Sg+Lat+PxPl2: [ща̄рщинн, ща̄рщинн]
     ща̄рыщ+N+Sg+Abl+PxPl2: [ща̄рщинныл, ща̄рщинныл]
     ща̄рыщ+N+Sg+Ins+PxPl2: [ща̄рщинтыл, ща̄рщинтыл]

     ща̄рыщ+N+Du+Nom+PxPl2: [ща̄рщагын, ща̄рщагы̄н]
     ща̄рыщ+N+Du+Loc+PxPl2: [ща̄рщагынт, ща̄рщагы̄нт]
     ща̄рыщ+N+Du+Lat+PxPl2: [ща̄рщагынн, ща̄рщагы̄нн]
     ща̄рыщ+N+Du+Abl+PxPl2: [ща̄рщагынныл, ща̄рщагы̄нныл]
     ща̄рыщ+N+Du+Ins+PxPl2: [ща̄рщагынтыл, ща̄рщагы̄нтыл]

     ща̄рыщ+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl2: [ща̄рщанын, ща̄рщаны̄н, ща̄рщан]
     ща̄рыщ+N+Pl+Loc+PxPl2: [ща̄рщанынт, ща̄рщаны̄нт, ща̄рщант]
     ща̄рыщ+N+Pl+Lat+PxPl2: [ща̄рщанынн, ща̄рщаны̄нн, ща̄рщанн]
     ща̄рыщ+N+Pl+Abl+PxPl2: [ща̄рщанынныл, ща̄рщаны̄нныл, ща̄рщанныл]
     ща̄рыщ+N+Pl+Ins+PxPl2: [ща̄рщанынтыл, ща̄рщаны̄нтыл, ща̄рщантыл]

     ща̄рыщ+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl3: ща̄рщаныл
     ща̄рыщ+N+Sg+Loc+PxPl3: ща̄рщанылт
     ща̄рыщ+N+Sg+Lat+PxPl3: ща̄рщанылн
     ща̄рыщ+N+Sg+Abl+PxPl3: ща̄рщанылныл
     ща̄рыщ+N+Sg+Ins+PxPl3: ща̄рщанылтыл

     ща̄рыщ+N+Du+Nom+PxPl3: ща̄рщаганыл
     ща̄рыщ+N+Du+Loc+PxPl3: ща̄рщаганылт
     ща̄рыщ+N+Du+Lat+PxPl3: ща̄рщаганылн
     ща̄рыщ+N+Du+Abl+PxPl3: ща̄рщаганылныл
     ща̄рыщ+N+Du+Ins+PxPl3: ща̄рщаганылтыл

     ща̄рыщ+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl3: [ща̄рщаныл, ща̄рщананыл]
     ща̄рыщ+N+Pl+Loc+PxPl3: [ща̄рщанылт, ща̄рщананылт]
     ща̄рыщ+N+Pl+Lat+PxPl3: [ща̄рщанылн, ща̄рщананылн]
     ща̄рыщ+N+Pl+Abl+PxPl3: [ща̄рщанылныл, ща̄рщананылныл]
     ща̄рыщ+N+Pl+Ins+PxPl3: [ща̄рщанылтыл, ща̄рщананылтыл]
